Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-501
Contracts; appropriation a condition precedent.

No contract shall be made by the city council in a city of the first class or any committee or member thereof and no expense shall be incurred by any of the officers or departments of the city, whether the object of the expenditure shall have been ordered by the city council or not, unless an appropriation shall have been previously made concerning such expense, except as otherwise expressly provided by law.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 44, p. 243;

R.S.1913, § 4900;

C.S.1922, § 4068;

C.S.1929, § 16-501;

R.S.1943, § 16-501;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 76;

Laws 2019, LB194, § 28.